Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2377
Local hospital district; deposit in institutions outside district; when.

When banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions located in the local hospital district refuse or neglect to bid on money of the local hospital district, when there are no banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions in the local hospital district, or when the banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions located in the local hospital district do not have sufficient capital and surplus to receive such money under sections 77-2369 to 77-2385, then any surplus over the amount specified that banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions in the local hospital district may receive shall be deposited in banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions outside of the local hospital district having sufficient capital and surplus under the same conditions and terms as if in the local hospital district. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1994, LB 1118, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 77.